Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204C.07, is amended to read: 204C.07 CHALLENGERS. Subdivision 1. new text begin Definitions and new text end partisan elections. new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "polling place" means a precinct polling place or any location where a voter may vote early or cast an in-person absentee ballot during the 18 days before the election as provided in section 203B.081. new text end new text begin (b) new text end At an election to fill partisan offices, the chair of an authorized committee of each major political party may appoint by written certificate voters from that political party to act as challengers of voters at deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end polling place deleted text begin for each precinctdeleted text end . Only one challenger from each major political party deleted text begin for each precinctdeleted text end shall be allowed to remain in deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end polling place at one time. Subd. 2. Nonpartisan elections. At an election to fill nonpartisan offices, each nonpartisan candidate may appoint by written certificate voters to act as challengers of voters at deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end polling place deleted text begin for each precinctdeleted text end . Only one challenger for each candidate shall be allowed to remain in deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end polling place deleted text begin for each precinctdeleted text end at one time. Subd. 3. Elections on a question. At an election where a question is to be voted upon in an election jurisdiction, the appropriate mayor of a city, school board of a school district, or board of supervisors of a town, upon receiving a written petition signed by at least 25 eligible voters, shall appoint by written certificate one voter for each deleted text begin precinctdeleted text end new text begin polling placenew text end in the municipality, or school district if applicable, to act as a challenger of voters in the polling place deleted text begin for that precinctdeleted text end . The petition must be delivered to the clerk of the municipality or school conducting the election. Subd. 3a. Residence requirement. A challenger must be a resident of this state. Appointed challengers seeking admission to a polling place to serve in that capacity must prove their status as a resident of this state by presenting one of the documents listed in section 201.061, subdivision 3. Challengers new text begin serving in a precinct polling place do not new text end need deleted text begin notdeleted text end new text begin tonew text end prove residence in the precinct in which they seek to act as a challenger. Subd. 4. Restrictions on conduct. An election judge must not be appointed as a challenger. new text begin In a polling place where early voting or absentee voting is conducted, a person authorized to perform the election duties required by section 203B.081, subdivision 3, must not be appointed as a challenger. new text end The election judges new text begin or persons authorized to perform the election duties required by section 203B.081, subdivision 3, new text end must permit challengers appointed pursuant to this section to be present in the polling place during the hours of voting deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . On election day, challengers must be allowednew text end to remain there until the votes are counted and the results declared. new text begin Prior to election day, challengers must be allowed to remain in the polling place until the ballots have been secured at the close of voting. new text end A challenger must not handle or inspect registration cards, files, or lists. Challengers must not prepare in any manner any list of individuals who have or have not voted. They must not attempt to influence voting in any manner. In accordance with section 204C.12, challengers must not converse with a voter. Subd. 5. Prohibited challenges. Challengers and the political parties that appointed them must not compile lists of voters to challenge on the basis of mail sent by a political party that was returned as undeliverable or if receipt by the intended recipient was not acknowledged in the case of registered mail. This subdivision applies to any local, state, or national affiliate of a political party that has appointed challengers, as well as any subcontractors, vendors, or other individuals acting as agents on behalf of a political party. A violation of this subdivision is a gross misdemeanor. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204C.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. new text begin Scope; new text end manner of challenging. new text begin (a) This section applies to challengers in polling places as defined in section 204C.07, subdivision 1. A person authorized to perform the election duties required by section 203B.081, subdivision 3, must perform the functions required of an election judge by this section. new text end new text begin (b) new text end An election judge shall, and an authorized challenger or other voter may, challenge an individual based on personal knowledge that the individual is not an eligible voter. Sec. 3. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must codify Minnesota Statutes, section 204C.07, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), as Minnesota Statutes, section 204C.07, subdivision 1a. new text end